Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Article 1. In General
§ 24-3-115.
Appraisers; notification of appointment required; contents.

The county clerk shall cause each of the said appraisers to be notified in writing, of his appointment, stating in said notice, first, the names of all appraisers, second, the names of all claimants for damages, on account of the location or alteration of the said road, with the amount of damages asked by each claimant, third, stating when their report must be filed, and fourth, the law relating to their duty as found in W.S.

24-3-116

. The county clerk shall prepare suitable blanks, for such notice, for the oath of the appraisers and for the report, a proper number of which shall be forwarded by him to them.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 17; R.S. 1899, § 1922; C.S. 1910, § 2529; C.S. 1920, § 3001; R.S. 1931, § 52-220; C.S. 1945, § 48-320; W.S. 1957, § 24-57.

Applied

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952).

Cited

in

North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923); Bliss v. Board of County Comm'rs, 70 Wyo. 42, 244 P.2d 508,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1952).

§ 24-3-116.
Appraisers; specific duties enumerated; compensation.

The said appraisers shall, within ten (10) days after receiving notice of their appointment, meet at some convenient place, on the line of said proposed or altered road, and take and administer to each other, an oath or affirmation to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties. They shall then view the ground, so far as they shall deem it necessary, and fix the amount of damages sustained by each claimant, after allowing for all benefits that may accrue to each claimant, by reason of the location or alteration of the said proposed road. They, or a majority of them, shall as soon as practicable, after performing their said duties, make a report in writing to the county clerk of their doings, stating that they were so sworn or affirmed as aforesaid, before performing their duties and fixing the amount of damages, if any, sustained by each claimant, after allowing and deducting for benefits, and where they have disallowed claims for damages, they shall so state in their report, and they shall immediately transmit their report, when made, to the county clerk. They shall, whenever they can conveniently do so, notify the claimants or their agents, of the place of their meeting and may hear such evidence as they may deem necessary in determining the amount of damages fixed by them. They are hereby authorized to administer oaths to each other and to such witnesses as they may hear. If any one (1) of them shall fail or refuse to perform his duty, the other two (2) appraisers shall serve and shall appoint a suitable and disinterested elector in his place, who shall be within easy access, and he shall be sworn or affirmed in like manner as the other two (2) appraisers, and the facts of such appointment and qualification shall be stated in said report to the county clerk. The said appraisers shall each receive for his compensation such reasonable sum as the board of county commissioners shall allow.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 18; R.S. 1899, § 1923; C.S. 1910, § 2530; C.S. 1920, § 3002; R.S. 1931, § 52-221; C.S. 1945, § 48-321; W.S. 1957, § 24-58.

Cross references. —

As to oaths generally, see chapter 2 of title 1.

Failure to fix time for meeting of appraisers. —

While failure to fix a time for meeting of appraisers was irregularity, such failure did not render proceeding to condemn land for highway illegal or subject to collateral attack. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Oath of appraisers. —

In proceeding to condemn land for highway where appraisers were not sworn by themselves and instead by county clerk, failure to follow provisions of statute exactly would be mere irregularity not subject to collateral attack. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Intention of legislature was to avoid inconvenience to appraisers in event county clerk or other person authorized to administer oaths was not available. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Where appraisers took oath “to duly and truly” appraise instead of oath “to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties,” compliance with statute was sufficient. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Nature of proceeding. —

Proceeding for establishment of public road and taking of land therefor is a special proceeding. Gillespie v. Board of Comm'rs, 47 Wyo. 1, 30 P.2d 797,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1934), limited, Stringer v. Board of County Comm'rs, 347 P.2d 197,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1959).

Full hearing, though without notice of appraisers' meeting,not denial of due process. —

This section and §

24-3-118

indicate that parties should be heard, in the case of the appraisers as they “may deem necessary” and in the case of the county board as, in their judgment, “the public good may require,” and where the landowner was given, and took, the opportunity to have a full hearing in the district court to which an appeal from the county board was taken, there was not a denial of due process of law, although landowner was not given notice of time and place of appraisers' meeting to fix the damages to be awarded. H K D Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1952).

Change in appraisers. —

Fact that report of appraisers does not disclose how one appraiser took place of another who seemingly was first selected is not such defect as would invalidate proceeding, but is at most an irregularity. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Cited

in

Kelly v. Board of County Comm'rs, 24 Wyo. 386, 159 P. 1086,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(1916); North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923); Bliss v. Board of County Comm'rs, 70 Wyo. 42, 244 P.2d 508,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1952); TZ Land & Cattle Co. v. Grieve, 887 P.2d 511,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 24-3-117.
Neglect of duty by appraiser or viewer.

If any viewer or appraiser shall refuse or neglect to perform any of the duties required by law or shall fail to act after his appointment, without a satisfactory excuse for such refusal or neglect, he shall be fined in any sum not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00), upon his conviction thereof in any court of competent jurisdiction, and such fine when collected shall be paid into the county treasury for the benefit of the road fund.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 27; R.S. 1899, § 1932; C.S. 1910, § 2539; C.S. 1920, § 3011; R.S. 1931, § 52-230; C.S. 1945, § 48-330; W.S. 1957, § 24-59.

Cross references. —

As to state-county road construction account, see §

24-2-110

.

§ 24-3-118.
Hearing before county commissioners; determination and payment of damages; entry on land; abandonment prohibited; records; surveys.

At the next meeting of the county commissioners after the report of the appraisers has been filed, or as soon thereafter as may be practicable, the said board may hear testimony and consider petitions for and remonstrances against the establishment or alteration, as the case may be of any road, or may establish or alter any road or may refuse so to do, as in the judgment of the said board, the public good may require, but in case there shall be no claim for damages filed, they shall act as speedily as possible in the matter. Said board may increase or diminish the damages allowed by the appraisers, and may make such establishment or alteration of any road, dependent or conditioned upon the payment, in whole or in part, of the damages awarded or expenses incurred in relation thereto by the petitioners for such road or such alteration of any road.

The amount of damages awarded, if any, shall immediately be paid to the person or persons entitled thereto or deposited with the county clerk for delivery to such person or persons, which payment shall be without prejudice to the right of such person or persons to appeal to the district court as provided by law.

When the road has been established and the award has been paid by the board of county commissioners or by the department of transportation, to the person or persons entitled, or deposited with the county clerk, the highway authorities and their contractors and employees may take possession and exercise full control of the land within the right-of-way of the road so established.

After the county or the department of transportation has taken possession of the right-of-way, there shall be no abandonment of the establishing of the highway, and in the event of an appeal by an owner of real estate affected to the district court from the award finally made by the board of county commissioners, the board shall pay the amount finally determined to be due.

A certificate, authorized by the board of county commissioners and signed by its chairman, setting forth the legal description of the property taken shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk, and indexed in like manner and with like effect as if it were a conveyance of the easement or right-of-way from said owners to the county.

If, upon considering and acting upon the report of the viewers or otherwise, the board of county commissioners shall decide to lay out or alter any road, they shall cause the county surveyor to make an accurate survey thereof, if such survey is necessary, and to plat the same in books to be provided by the county for such purpose, and the county clerk shall record in the same books opposite or near to such plat so that the same may be easily ascertained to be concerning the platted road, the proceeding of the said board in relation to the location, establishment or alteration of said road, in order to keep in a separate book a record of all the county roads of that county.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 19; R.S. 1899, § 1924; C.S. 1910, § 2531; C.S. 1920, § 3003; R.S. 1931, § 52-222; C.S. 1945, § 48-322; Laws 1953, ch. 181, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 24-60; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to duty of county surveyor to make surveys and to keep plats, see §

18-3-702

.

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

For discussion of legislative and judicial history of section,

see Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

Establishment of roadway constitutes taking of property. —

The establishment of a roadway, in the absence of consent, constitutes the taking of property by the county for which a party may make a claim for compensation according to constitutional requirements. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

This section has no application to proceedings to acquire county road by prescription.

Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

Authority of county commissioners in establishing road dependsupon statute. —

Counties exercise a portion of the power of the state government but only those powers granted by the legislature or reasonably implied therefrom, so it follows that the authority of the commissioners in establishing a road depends upon the provisions of the statutes relating thereto. Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

And the commissioners must comply with this section

in order to effect the establishment of a public road. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

Nature of proceeding. —

Proceeding for the establishment of a public road and the taking of land therefor is a special proceeding. Gillespie v. Board of Comm'rs, 47 Wyo. 1, 30 P.2d 797,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1934), limited, Stringer v. Board of County Comm'rs, 347 P.2d 197,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1959).

Lack of jurisdiction fatal. —

In discussing the question of errors and irregularities as distinguished from jurisdictional defects, the supreme court has indicated that lack of jurisdiction is fatal either in a judicial or a quasi-judicial tribunal. Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

Requirements were added to this section as it originally stood,

evidencing legislative concern that there be a complete and specific proceeding when lands were sought to be taken for public roads. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

Proceedings must be definite and certain. —

All persons concerned, including those whose property is to be taken, are entitled to be informed of the land to be occupied by the proposed road, so the proceedings to create a highway should be so definite and certain that a competent surveyor could, with the record before him, point out its location. Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

Proof of ownership condition precedent to award. —

Where damage for the taking of land for a highway is dependent upon ownership of property or property right involved, proof of such ownership is a condition precedent to an award being made. Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1954).

Land must be specifically identified. —

Before a county can take the necessary land to establish a roadway it must identify the land specifically so that the party owning it may assert his claim for just compensation. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

All persons, including parties whose land is to be taken, are entitled to be informed of the land which the road is to occupy, and the description in the plat should be so definite and certain that a competent surveyor could, based upon the description, determine the road's location. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

County road cannot be established without there being placed of record a plat of the survey

of such road together with the proceedings in relation to its location, establishment or alteration. Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1954).

Meaning of words “if such survey is necessary.” —

The words in this section “if such survey is [deemed] necessary” were intended by the legislature to apply to situations wherein there was already in existence a survey which might be adopted and utilized. Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

Survey is necessary but need not be made by county surveyor.—

The cases decided under §

24-1-101

require a record of all roads in a county, but since there can be no record until there is a survey, it follows that the county commissioners are wholly without authority in arbitrarily determining that no survey is necessary. However, this holding should not be construed as requiring counties to employ county surveyors since anyone duly qualified in such a profession might properly act in a capacity of county surveyor to comply substantially with the provisions of the statutes requiring an accurate survey to be made. Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

The survey and plat establish for all times where the road is located

and in effect establish ownership in the county. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

And provide method of proving that road was established. —

A method by which proof could be made that a county road was established would be to show that a copy of the plat and survey notes had been filed in the office of the county clerk. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

When county relies on prescriptive title. —

If a board of county commissioners relies upon the county's having obtained prescriptive title to lands within a right-of-way, or any part thereof, in order to avoid the payment of damage for their taking, the inception of such prescriptive title must be evidenced by more formal acts than the use of the road by the public or by the county's construction and maintenance of the road because, in order to be empowered to acquire such prescriptive title, the records of the county must show not only the survey plat of the road but also the proceedings of the board in relation to the road's location, establishment or alteration, thus making manifest the county's purpose to acquire the lands involved. Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1954).

Recording of transfer by eminent domain not required priorto 1953. —

Where the state acquired land by eminent domain under condemnation proceedings in 1950, the title the state acquired was valid and good against any subsequent purchaser, since prior to 1953 no statute required the transfer of title by eminent domain to be recorded in the ordinary and regular books of record kept for transfer of property by conveyances. State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Meeker, 75 Wyo. 210, 294 P.2d 603,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1956).

Irregularity not invalidating proceeding. —

Fact that report of appraisers does not disclose how one appraiser took place of another who seemingly was first selected is not such defect as would invalidate proceeding, but is at most an irregularity. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

When mistaken belief may excuse late appeal. —

Where a landowner justifiably, but wrongly, believed that a challenge to the necessity of a road was a condition precedent to a hearing on the elements of adverse possession, he should not be penalized for a late appeal, and the case should be remanded to the district court for entry of an order directing the county board to provide a hearing in accordance with §

24-1-101

.Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

Cited

in

North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923); Bliss v. Board of County Comm'rs, 70 Wyo. 42, 244 P.2d 508,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1952).

§ 24-3-119.
Appeals from decisions of county commissioners; notice; bond required.

Any applicant for damages claimed, or caused by the establishment or alteration of any road, may appeal from the final decision of the board of the county commissioners to the district court of the county, in which the land lies, for the taking of which for a public road, damages are asked; but notice of such appeal must be made to the county clerk, within thirty (30) days after such decision has been made by the said board, or such claim shall be deemed to have been abandoned. No appeal shall be allowed, unless a good and sufficient bond be given by the party appealing, in a sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) to cover costs, said bond to be approved by the clerk of the district court.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 24; R.S. 1899, § 1929; C.S. 1910, § 2536; C.S. 1920, § 3008; R.S. 1931, § 52-227; C.S. 1945, § 48-327; W.S. 1957, § 24-61.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

This section specifically refers to a “public road”

rather than a private road. Hoffmeister v. McIntosh, 361 P.2d 678,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 364 P.2d 823,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1961).

Legislature intended to prescribe different procedures forestablishment of public roads and private roads. —

The context, position of the sections and the insertion of subheads in the original act (Laws 1895, ch. 69) are unmistakable indicia that the legislature intended to prescribe different procedures for the establishment of public roads (which then included national, state, territorial and county roads) and for the establishment of private roads. Hoffmeister v. McIntosh, 361 P.2d 678,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 364 P.2d 823,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1961).

Right of appeal satisfies due process requirement of hearing.—

Due process does not require that hearing before viewers or appraisers be afforded, but is satisfied by full hearing that may be obtained by exercising right to appeal. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

It is not necessary that property owner be notified of every step of proceedings

in order to constitute due process of law, provided that at some stage he have full opportunity to present case to impartial tribunal. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Presumption in favor of jurisdiction of county commissioners.—

In establishing highway, every presumption is in favor of jurisdiction of board of county commissioners as to validity of its proceedings on collateral attack. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Supreme court reluctant to disturb judgment based on findingsof 3 fact-finding bodies. —

Where three fact-finding bodies — the appraisers, the board of county commissioners and the district court — agreed that an award made in eminent domain proceedings should stand, the supreme court would be most reluctant to interfere with the considered judgment of the district court in an appeal under this section. H K D Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1952).

Where there was no evidence of passion, prejudice or other elements intervening in the results attained

by appraisers, board of county commissioners and district court in an eminent domain proceeding, the judgment of the district court in an appeal under this section was not reversed on account of prejudicial error. H K D Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1952).

And contention as to lack of notice of appraisers' meetingwithout merit. —

Where it was contended by landowner, in an appeal to the supreme court from a judgment confirming an award made in an eminent domain proceeding, that it had not been given notice of the time and place of the appraisers' meeting to fix the damages to be awarded, this contention was without merit since this had not been assigned as error in the record, had not been presented to trial court, had not appeared in its brief and the record itself did not show that it had been denied the privilege of introducing testimony in its behalf before the board of county commissioners. H K D Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1952).

Collateral attack. —

Suit to enjoin county commissioners from establishing highway is collateral attack upon eminent domain proceedings. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Mere irregularities do not authorize relief in equity. —

Mere irregularities or errors not rendering proceedings invalid do not authorize relief in equity to restrain condemnation proceedings. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Appearance in proceedings precludes subsequent suit for injunction.—

Where an owner appears in condemnation proceedings, he cannot afterwards enjoin an entry on grounds which might have been litigated in such proceedings. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Where landowner could have litigated all matters urged as grounds for invalidating proceedings to condemn land for highway purposes in district court by appeal from action of board, but did not, he could not enjoin board from proceeding. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Cited

in

North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923); Thunderbasin Land, Livestock & Inv. Co. v. County of Laramie, 5 P.3d 774,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 24-3-120.
Appeals from decisions of county commissioners; duties of county clerk.

The county clerk shall, within ten (10) days after the notice of an appeal as provided for in W.S.

24-3-119

is filed in his office, make out and file in the office of the clerk of the district court, in his county, a transcript of the papers on file in his office, and the proceedings of the board in relation to such damages.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 25; R.S. 1899, § 1930; C.S. 1910, § 2537; C.S. 1920, § 3009; R.S. 1931, § 52-228; C.S. 1945, § 48-328; W.S. 1957, § 24-62.

Cited

in

North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923).

§ 24-3-121.
Appeals from decisions of county commissioners; recovery of damages; court costs.

The amount of damages to which the claimant shall be entitled on such appeal shall be ascertained in the same manner as in a civil action, and the amount so ascertained, if any, shall be entered of record, but no judgment shall be entered therefor. The amount thus ascertained shall be certified by the clerk of the court to the county clerk who shall thereafter proceed as if such amount had been allowed by the board of the county commissioners to the claimant as damages. If the appellant shall fail to recover an amount exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) above the amount allowed to him by the board of the county commissioners, he shall pay all costs of the appeal.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 26; R.S. 1899, § 1931; C.S. 1910, § 2538; C.S. 1920, § 3010; R.S. 1931, § 52-229; C.S. 1945, § 48-329; W.S. 1957, § 24-63.

Appealable order. —

An order of court that jury's verdict be allowed and approved was an appealable order in an action appealed from the board of county commissioners to the district court to determine amount of compensation for land taken for a road. Gillespie v. Board of Comm'rs, 47 Wyo. 1, 30 P.2d 797,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1934), limited, Stringer v. Board of County Comm'rs, 347 P.2d 197,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1959).

Road establishment proceedings. —

Adoption of Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act did not repeal procedure set forth in road establishment statutes, which required that damages be determined “as in a civil action”; district court was therefore required, on appeal, to conduct a trial de novo in order to determine damages to land owner in road establishment proceeding. Thunderbasin Land, Livestock & Inv. Co. v. County of Laramie County, 5 P.3d 774,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Bliss v. Board of County Comm'rs, 70 Wyo. 42, 244 P.2d 508,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1952).

Quoted

in

Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1954).

Cited

in

North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923).

§ 24-3-122.
Condemned land tax free during use by state.

No taxes covering the real estate taken by the county or the department of transportation for rights-of-way shall be assessed, or charged against the land owner or owners during the time that rights-of-way are being used for the purposes for which they were established.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 181, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 24-64; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 24-3-123.
Effect of location of new road on route of previous road.

The establishment of a new road on the route of a road already established according to law, shall not vacate any road previously established, unless such vacation shall be ordered by the board of the county commissioners.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 1925; C.S. 1910, § 2532; C.S. 1920, § 3004; R.S. 1931, § 52-223; C.S. 1945, § 48-323; W.S. 1957, § 24-65.

Applied

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952).

§ 24-3-124.
Removal of fences on right-of-way.

Whenever a public road is ordered to be established or altered, according to the provisions of this act, which shall pass through, or on enclosed lands, the road overseer, or other proper officer, shall give the owner, agent or occupant of such lands, notice in writing to remove the fences thereon, and if such owner, agent or occupant shall not move his fence, within thirty (30) days thereafter, the same may be removed by the proper officer, and the road opened and worked; and such owner shall forfeit and pay twenty dollars ($20.00) for each day he shall permit his fence to remain after said thirty (30) days, and shall pay all necessary cost of removal, to be collected by the proper officer, in any court of competent jurisdiction, for the use and benefit of the general county road fund.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 1926; C.S. 1910, § 2533; C.S. 1920, § 3005; R.S. 1931, § 52-224; C.S. 1945, § 48-324; W.S. 1957, § 24-66.

Cross references. —

As to fences across roads generally, see §§

11-28-104

and

11-28-105

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” referred to in this section, mean Laws 1895, ch. 69, which appears herein as §§

24-1-101

,

24-1-104

,

24-1-105

,

24-1-111

,

24-1-113

,

24-1-116

,

24-1-117

,

24-3-101

through

24-3-121

,

24-3-123

through

24-3-125

and

24-9-101

through

24-9-104

.

Obligation to work a road depends upon the exercise of sound discretion by the board,

considering the best interest of the county as a whole, taking into consideration the extent of the road's anticipated use, its importance in relation to other roads, the practicability of maintenance and the availability of county finances for that purpose. Board of County Comm'rs v. State, 369 P.2d 537,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1962).

But “may” in this section should be interpreted as “shall”.

Board of County Comm'rs v. State, 369 P.2d 537,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1962).

Thus, mandamus to compel removal of fences and obstructionsis proper. —

See Board of County Comm'rs v. State, 369 P.2d 537,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1962).

Authorizing obstruction of highway. —

Right of public to use highway can only be taken away through official acts of board of commissioners, and fact that commissioners individually authorized one to move his fence and thereby obstruct such highway is insufficient. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Applied

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952).

§ 24-3-125.
Streets in unincorporated towns or villages declared public roads; working.

All public streets of towns or villages, not incorporated, are a part of the public roads, and all road overseers, or persons having charge of the same, in their respective districts or counties, shall work the same as provided by law or ordered by the board of the county commissioners of the proper county.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 22; R.S. 1899, § 1927; C.S. 1910, § 2534; C.S. 1920, § 3006; R.S. 1931, § 52-225; C.S. 1945, § 48-325; W.S. 1957, § 24-67.

§ 24-3-126.
Abandonment of portion of highway upon reconstruction or relocation of existing highway; relinquishment to county or city in lieu of abandonment.

The transportation commission may abandon or relinquish any portion of state highways upon the reconstruction or relocation of any portion of an existing state highway.

Prior to abandonment of any portion of a state highway, the transportation commission shall offer the highway to the governing body of any county or city in which the highway is located. Upon being notified of the transportation commission’s intent to abandon any portion of a state highway, the governing body of the county or city shall comply with the procedures provided for in paragraph (c)(ii) of this section in order to initiate transfer of the state highway.

The abandonment or relinquishment of any portion of state highways shall be conclusively evidenced by the resolution entered in the minute record of the commission. A certified copy of the resolution shall be recorded by the secretary of the transportation commission in the office of the county clerk of any county in which abandoned or relinquished highway right-of-way is located. Abandonment or relinquishment shall not affect the rights of corporations or their successors in interest acquired under the provisions of W.S.

1-26-813

to continue the operation and maintenance of transmission and distribution lines constructed upon the right-of-way and shall not affect the rights of any corporation or successors in interest to continue to maintain any facility lawfully in the highway right-of-way at the time of any abandonment or relinquishment. Corporations shall have the right to go upon these lands for the purposes associated with maintenance or use of their facility. Specific rules regarding relinquishment and abandonment are:

Upon the entry of the resolution of abandonment in the minute record of the commission, all title and interest, except as herein provided, to the highway right-of-way shall pass to and vest in the present adjacent landowner according to the portion contributed by adjacent landowner or his predecessor in interest;

Instead of abandonment, the transportation commission may, upon written request, relinquish to any county or city any portion of a state highway within the county or city proposed to be removed from the state highway system. The request shall be in the form of a resolution adopted by the governing body of the county or city, indicating that the portion of the state highway sought by the governing body will be used for a local public purpose enumerated in the resolution and expressing the agreement of the county or city to assume all responsibility with regard thereto. Relinquishment by the transportation commission shall be by entry of the resolution of relinquishment in the minute record of the commission and by quitclaim deed effective upon recordation in the office of the county clerk and recorder of any county in which the real property is located.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 160, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-67.1; Laws 1965, ch. 7, § 1; 1983, ch. 139, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to closing or restricting use of state highways, see §

24-1-106

.

Implied easement. —

Where a limited liability company (LLC) severed real property in a transaction that included an “access agreement” between the subsequent owners, the access agreement established that parties intended to allow access and resulted in an implied easement; the fact that, following the severance, the State of Wyoming abandoned certain property adjacent to the severed lots did not affect the easement, and whether the LLC had the authority to grant an easement across property owned by Wyoming was irrelevant because the district court found an implied, not an express, easement. Hansuld v. Lariat Diesel Corp., 2003 WY 165, 81 P.3d 215,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 2003).

Applicability to county roads. —

The rule embodied in this section, that if the public has an easement on land occupied by a highway, title reverts to the fee owners and exclusive possession is restored to them upon vacation of the highway, is generally accepted and applies to county roads as well. Schott v. Miller, 943 P.2d 1174,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1997).

Special rights granted to individuals extinguished. —

Since the legislature provided that all title and interest to the vacated portion of a county road reverts to the adjacent landowner subject to only a few designated exceptions, any other special rights-of-way, licenses, or privileges which a county has granted to individuals are extinguished upon vacation of the road and relinquishment of the public's interest. Schott v. Miller, 943 P.2d 1174,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 24-3-127.
Cooperative agreements with federal agencies to construct, maintain and use roads within county.

The board of county commissioners of any county of this state may, in its discretion, enter into cooperative agreements with the forest service of the U.S. department of agriculture or other federal agency to provide for the joint construction, maintenance and use of roads located within the boundaries of the county, where such roads are used by the forest service or other federal agency in the protection, administration and utilization of the national forests and national recreation areas or other federal lands and are also used by communities or persons within or adjacent to such national forests or other federal lands in the use and development of the resources thereof or where such roads otherwise serve the needs of the public.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 10, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-67.2.

Cross references. —

As to cooperation with transportation commission in construction of county roads, see §

24-2-110

.

As to contracts and agreements with the United States government, see §

24-2-112

.